num/enhunum2.lexc
!!!enhunum1.lexc!!!
! szor, szer, ször, edik, adik, odik, ed, ad,öd ragok

Multichar_Symbols  +Num

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Tmp +Ik +Iadj +Kas +Npref+ +Par
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
§aeoenr§ §oeanr§ 

LEXICON Root
NumPref2 ;
NumPref3 ;
NumPref12 ;
NumPref13 ;
NumPref14 ;
Num;
Num1;
!Num2;

Lexicon NumPref2
+Npref+:egy NumPref12;
+Npref+:egyes NumPref12;
+Npref+:kettő NumPref12;
+Npref+:két NumPref12;
+Npref+:kettes NumPref12;
+Npref+:három NumPref12;
+Npref+:három NumPref12;
+Npref+:négy NumPref12;
+Npref+:négyes NumPref12;
+Npref+:öt NumPref12;
+Npref+:ötös NumPref12;
+Npref+:hat NumPref12;
+Npref+:hatos NumPref12;
+Npref+:hét NumPref12;
+Npref+:hetes NumPref12;
+Npref+:nyolc NumPref12;
+Npref+:nyolcas NumPref12;
+Npref+:kilenc NumPref12;
+Npref+:kilences NumPref12;
+Npref+:egy NumPref13;
+Npref+:egyes NumPref13;
+Npref+:kettő NumPref13;
+Npref+:két NumPref13;
+Npref+:kettes NumPref13;
+Npref+:három NumPref13;
+Npref+:három NumPref13;
+Npref+:négy NumPref13;
+Npref+:négyes NumPref13;
+Npref+:öt NumPref13;
+Npref+:ötös NumPref13;
+Npref+:hat NumPref13;
+Npref+:hatos NumPref13;
+Npref+:hét NumPref13;
+Npref+:hetes NumPref13;
+Npref+:nyolc NumPref13;
+Npref+:nyolcas NumPref13;
+Npref+:kilenc NumPref13;
+Npref+:kilences NumPref13;
+Npref+:egy NumPref14;
+Npref+:egyes NumPref14;
+Npref+:kettő NumPref14;
+Npref+:két NumPref14;
+Npref+:kettes NumPref14;
+Npref+:három NumPref14;
+Npref+:három NumPref14;
+Npref+:négy NumPref14;
+Npref+:négyes NumPref14;
+Npref+:öt NumPref14;
+Npref+:ötös NumPref14;
+Npref+:hat NumPref14;
+Npref+:hatos NumPref14;
+Npref+:hét NumPref14;
+Npref+:hetes NumPref14;
+Npref+:nyolc NumPref14;
+Npref+:nyolcas NumPref14;
+Npref+:kilenc NumPref14;
+Npref+:kilences NumPref14;
          Num;

Lexicon NumPref3
+Npref+:tíz NumPref2;
+Npref+:tizen NumPref2;
+Npref+:húsz NumPref2;
+Npref+:huszon NumPref2;
+Npref+:harminc NumPref2;
+Npref+:negyven NumPref2;
+Npref+:ötven NumPref2;
+Npref+:hatvan NumPref2;
+Npref+:hetven NumPref2;
+Npref+:nyolcvan NumPref2;
+Npref+:kilencven NumPref2;
+Npref+:tíz NumPref13;
+Npref+:húsz NumPref13;
+Npref+:harminc NumPref13;
+Npref+:negyven NumPref13;
+Npref+:ötven NumPref13;
+Npref+:hatvan NumPref13;
+Npref+:hetven NumPref13;
+Npref+:nyolcvan NumPref13;
+Npref+:kilencven NumPref13;
+Npref+:tíz NumPref14;
+Npref+:húsz NumPref14;
+Npref+:harminc NumPref14;
+Npref+:negyven NumPref14;
+Npref+:ötven NumPref14;
+Npref+:hatvan NumPref14;
+Npref+:hetven NumPref14;
+Npref+:nyolcvan NumPref14;
+Npref+:kilencven NumPref14;
          Num;

Lexicon NumPref12
+Npref+:száz NumPref13;
+Npref+:száz NumPref14;
+Npref+:száz NumPref3;
+Npref+:száz NumPref2;
+Npref+:száz Num1;
          Num1;

Lexicon NumPref13
+Npref+:ezer NumPref12;
+Npref+:ezer NumPref14;
+Npref+:ezer NumPref3;
+Npref+:ezer NumPref2;
          Num;

Lexicon NumPref14
!+Npref+:millió NumPref13;
!+Npref+:millió NumPref12;
!+Npref+:millió NumPref3;
!+Npref+:millió NumPref2;
+Npref+:millió Num;
         Num;

LEXICON Num
ketted AddNumod;
harmad AddNumod;
negyed AddNumod;
ötöd AddNumod;
hatod AddNumod;
heted AddNumod;
nyolcad AddNumod;
kilenced AddNumod;
tized AddNumod;
huszad AddNumod;
harmincad AddNumod;
negyvened AddNumod;
ötvened AddNumod;
hatvanad AddNumod;
hetvened AddNumod;
nyolcvanad AddNumod;
kilencvened AddNumod;
század AddNumod;
ezred AddNumod;
milliomod AddNumod;
billiomod AddNumod;
milliárdod AddNumod;

LEXICON Num1
másod AddNumod;

!LEXICON Num2
!elő AddNumod2;

LEXICON AddNumod
+Num:0     Possod;
+Num:0     Plurod;
+Num:0     Famod;

LEXICON Possod
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par:^+cPar^§aeoenr§d       Szorod;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subod;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famod;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famod;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famod;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famod;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famod;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famod;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famod;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famod;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famod;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famod;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famod;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famod;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famod;

LEXICON Plurod
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genod;
                            Genod;
        
LEXICON Famod
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genod;
                       Genod;

LEXICON Genod
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseod;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseod;
                       Caseod;
 
LEXICON Caseod
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Subod
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! i
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;
LEXICON Szorod
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Subod;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik:^+cIk^ik                #;  ! ik
                            #;
